Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1301
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that state government actions have produced an increase in the numbers of boards, commissions, and similar entities that support, advise, direct, or administer various state programs. The process has evolved without sufficient legislative and executive oversight and without a system of checks and balances. Because the Legislature is responsible for the expenditure of public money and the shaping of the administration of state government and is held accountable for fiscal policy, the Legislature should also be responsible for the termination, continuation, or modification of such boards, commissions, and similar entities so that it may be assured that its directives have been faithfully carried out.

Laws 1999, LB 298, § 1.